Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Policies, Values, and Principles

33-1-201. Responsibilities of department — State policy toward mental health and developmental disabilities.

The department serves as the state's mental health and developmental disabilities authority and is responsible for system planning, setting policy and quality standards, system monitoring and evaluation, disseminating public information and advocacy for persons of all ages who have mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disabilities. It is the policy of the state to plan on the basis of and to promote the use of private and public service providers, without regard for funding source, to achieve outcomes and accomplishments that create opportunities for service recipients and potential service recipients to have the greatest possible control of their lives in the least restrictive environment that is appropriate for each person. The department shall plan for and promote the availability of a comprehensive array of high quality prevention, early intervention, treatment, and habilitation services and supports based on the needs and choices of service recipients and families served. The department shall include service recipients and members of service recipients' families in planning, developing, and monitoring the service systems.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 33-1-101, 33-1-201 — 33-1-209, 33-1-301 — 33-1-303 (Acts 1965, ch. 38, §§ 2, 8; 1965, ch. 82, §§ 1-2, 4-7; 1965, ch. 305, § 1; 1971, ch. 247, § 1; 1972, ch. 644, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 85, § 1; 1973, ch. 127, §§ 3, 4; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 1, 2, 5-7; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 3, 5-7, 16, 21; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 4; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(95); 1978, ch. 533, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, § 10; 1981, ch. 98, §§ 3, 4; 1981, ch. 224, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-301 - 33-302, 33-104 — 33-107, 33-308; 1984, ch. 794, § 11; 1984, ch. 922, § 1; 1986, ch. 570, § 1; 1987, ch. 98, § 1; 1988, ch. 623, § 1; 1990, ch. 920, § 1; 1990, ch. 1024, §§ 17-18; 1992, ch. 991, § 12; 1994, ch. 861, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 993, § 1; 1997, ch. 305, § 1; 1997, ch. 534, § 1; 1999, ch. 466, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2000, ch. 981, § 53) was deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Law Reviews.

One Fell Through the Cracks: Why Tennessee Needs an Initial Outpatient Commitment Statute (Lori R. Holyfield), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 221 (2011).

33-1-202. Statement of values underlying title.

Values upon which the law is predicated include, but are not limited to, individual rights, promotion of self-determination, respect, optimal health and safety, service recipient inclusion in the community, and service recipient life and service in typical community settings.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-1-203. Principles of service.

The following service principles are fundamental to carrying out the department's responsibilities:

Stable service systems that provide flexibility, advocacy, effective communication, targeted outcomes, continuous evaluation, and improvement based on best practice and research;

Early identification of needs and the inclusion of both prevention and early intervention services and supports;

Timely response to the needs, rights and desires of those served;

Treating service recipients and families with dignity and respect;

Protection of service recipients from abuse, neglect, and exploitation;

Accurate and responsible accountability for the use of public resources;

Ongoing education and skills development of the workforce; and

Cultural competence of persons providing service.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-1-204. Unnecessary entitlements not created — Programs subject to funding by general assembly.

This title shall not create entitlement to services and supports from the state except to the extent that services and supports are necessarily attached to deprivation of liberty by placement in facilities operated by the department. Implementation of any service or support at state expense under this title is subject to the availability of funds appropriated for that purpose in the general appropriations act.

While the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities is charged with the planning and development of services for persons with developmental disabilities, such services shall be subject to the availability of funding, and to approval of any waiver amendments which would be required to effectuate such new programs at such time that they are developed. The reassignment of responsibility for developmental disabilities services to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities does not create an entitlement to services for persons with developmental disabilities. Nor does it expand or affect in any way the population of persons who are currently eligible for programs and services currently available to persons with mental retardation.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 33-1-101, 33-1-201 — 33-1-209, 33-1-301 — 33-1-303 (Acts 1965, ch. 38, §§ 2, 8; 1965, ch. 82, §§ 1-2, 4-7; 1965, ch. 305, § 1; 1971, ch. 247, § 1; 1972, ch. 644, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 85, § 1; 1973, ch. 127, §§ 3, 4; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 1, 2, 5-7; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 3, 5-7, 16, 21; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 4; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(95); 1978, ch. 533, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, § 10; 1981, ch. 98, §§ 3, 4; 1981, ch. 224, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-301 - 33-302, 33-104 — 33-107, 33-308; 1984, ch. 794, § 11; 1984, ch. 922, § 1; 1986, ch. 570, § 1; 1987, ch. 98, § 1; 1988, ch. 623, § 1; 1990, ch. 920, § 1; 1990, ch. 1024, §§ 17-18; 1992, ch. 991, § 12; 1994, ch. 861, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 993, § 1; 1997, ch. 305, § 1; 1997, ch. 534, § 1; 1999, ch. 466, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2000, ch. 981, § 53) is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this section, funds were appropriated in Acts 2000, ch. 994.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.